Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1233
Emergency care provider; liability relating to consent.

No emergency care provider shall be subject to civil liability based solely upon failure to obtain consent in rendering emergency medical, surgical, hospital, or health services to any individual regardless of age when the patient is unable to give his or her consent for any reason and there is no other person reasonably available who is legally authorized to consent to the providing of such care.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 24;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5195;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 517;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 38.